Hawaii statutes.
§46-7 Agreements with federal government;
use of funds. The governing body or the planning commission or department
of the various counties, with the consent of the council, may enter into
agreements (which may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or
rule of law to the contrary) with the federal government or any other public
body or bodies respecting action to be taken pursuant to any of the powers
granted to it by law and furnish, expend, and receive any funds or other
assistance in connection with projects being or to be undertaken pursuant to
the powers. [L 1957, c 139, §1; Supp, §138-11.5; HRS §46-7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next